ca_ES/ca_ES.aff
SFX M Y 124
SFX M iré ir/CY iré
SFX M iré int/C iré
SFX M iré it/vY [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré it/vY [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ït/vY [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ït/vY [aeio]iré
SFX M iré its/Y [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré its/Y [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïts/Y [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïts/Y [aeio]iré
SFX M iré ida/Y [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré ida/Y [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïda/Y [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïda/Y [aeio]iré
SFX M iré ides/Y [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré ides/Y [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïdes/Y [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïdes/Y [aeio]iré
SFX M iré im/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré im/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïm/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïm/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré iu/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré iu/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïu/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïu/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré ia/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré ia/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïa/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïa/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré ies/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré ies/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïes/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïes/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré ia/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré ia/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïa/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïa/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré íem/Z iré
SFX M iré íeu/Z iré
SFX M iré ien/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré ien/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïen/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïen/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré í/Z iré
SFX M iré ires/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré ires/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïres/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïres/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré í/Z iré
SFX M iré írem/Z iré
SFX M iré íreu/Z iré
SFX M iré iren/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré iren/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïren/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïren/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré iré/Z iré
SFX M iré iràs/Z iré
SFX M iré irà/Z iré
SFX M iré irem/Z iré
SFX M iré ireu/Z iré
SFX M iré iran/Z iré
SFX M iré iria/Z iré
SFX M iré iries/Z iré
SFX M iré iria/Z iré
SFX M iré iríem/Z iré
SFX M iré iríeu/Z iré
SFX M iré irien/Z iré
SFX M iré im/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré im/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïm/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïm/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré iu/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré iu/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïu/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïu/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré ís/Z iré
SFX M iré ira/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré ira/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïra/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïra/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré issis/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré issis/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïssis/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïssis/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré isses/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré isses/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïsses/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïsses/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré ires/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré ires/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïres/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïres/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré ís/Z iré
SFX M iré ira/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré ira/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïra/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïra/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré íssim/Z iré
SFX M iré íssem/Z iré
SFX M iré írem/Z iré
SFX M iré íssiu/Z iré
SFX M iré ísseu/Z iré
SFX M iré íreu/Z iré
SFX M iré issin/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré issin/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïssin/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïssin/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré issen/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré issen/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïssen/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïssen/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré iren/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré iren/Z [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïren/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïren/Z [aeio]iré
SFX M iré im/C [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré im/C [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïm/C [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïm/C [aeio]iré
SFX M iré iu/C [^aeiou]iré
SFX M iré iu/C [gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïu/C [^gq]uiré
SFX M iré ïu/C [aeio]iré

SFX N Y 62
SFX N iré eixo/Z iré
SFX N iré esc/Z iré
SFX N iré isc/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX N iré isc/Z [gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsc/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsc/Z [aeio]iré
SFX N iré eixes/Z iré
SFX N iré ixes/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX N iré ixes/Z [gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïxes/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïxes/Z [aeio]iré
SFX N iré eix/Z iré
SFX N iré ix/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX N iré ix/Z [gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïx/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïx/Z [aeio]iré
SFX N iré eixen/Z iré
SFX N iré ixen/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX N iré ixen/Z [gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïxen/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïxen/Z [aeio]iré
SFX N iré eixi/Z iré
SFX N iré esqui/Z iré
SFX N iré isca/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX N iré isca/Z [gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsca/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsca/Z [aeio]iré
SFX N iré eixis/Z iré
SFX N iré esquis/Z iré
SFX N iré isques/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX N iré isques/Z [gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsques/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsques/Z [aeio]iré
SFX N iré eixi/Z iré
SFX N iré esqui/Z iré
SFX N iré isca/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX N iré isca/Z [gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsca/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsca/Z [aeio]iré
SFX N iré eixin/Z iré
SFX N iré esquin/Z iré
SFX N iré isquen/Z [^aeiou]iré
SFX N iré isquen/Z [gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsquen/Z [^gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsquen/Z [aeio]iré
SFX N iré eix/C iré
SFX N iré ix/C [^aeiou]iré
SFX N iré ix/C [gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïx/C [^gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïx/C [aeio]iré
SFX N iré eixi/D iré
SFX N iré esqui/D iré
SFX N iré isca/D [^aeiou]iré
SFX N iré isca/D [gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsca/D [^gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsca/D [aeio]iré
SFX N iré eixin/C iré
SFX N iré esquin/C iré
SFX N iré isquen/C [^aeiou]iré
SFX N iré isquen/C [gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsquen/C [^gq]uiré
SFX N iré ïsquen/C [aeio]iré

SFX O Y 12
SFX O a a/Z a
SFX O a es/Z a
SFX O a a/Z a
SFX O ia íem/Z [^eu]ia
SFX O ïa íem/Z ïa
SFX O eia èiem/Z eia
SFX O uia úiem/Z uia
SFX O ia íeu/Z [^eu]ia
SFX O ïa íeu/Z ïa
SFX O eia èieu/Z eia
SFX O uia úieu/Z uia
SFX O a en/Z a

SFX P Y 46
SFX P és o/Z [^c]és
SFX P cés ço/Z cés
SFX P és í/Z és
SFX P és eres/Z és
SFX P és é/Z és
SFX P és érem/Z és
SFX P és éreu/Z és
SFX P és eren/Z és
SFX P és i/Z és
SFX P és a/Z [^cgu]és
SFX P cés ça/Z cés
SFX P gés ja/Z gés
SFX P és is/Z és
SFX P és es/Z és
SFX P és i/Z és
SFX P és a/Z [^cgu]és
SFX P cés ça/Z cés
SFX P gés ja/Z gés
SFX P és em/Z és
SFX P és eu/Z és
SFX P és in/Z és
SFX P és en/Z és
SFX P és és/Z és
SFX P és era/Z és
SFX P és essis/Z és
SFX P és eres/Z és
SFX P és esses/Z és
SFX P és és/Z és
SFX P és era/Z és
SFX P és éssim/Z és
SFX P és éssem/Z és
SFX P és érem/Z és
SFX P és éssiu/Z és
SFX P és ésseu/Z és
SFX P és éreu/Z és
SFX P és essin/Z és
SFX P és essen/Z és
SFX P és eren/Z és
SFX P és i/D és
SFX P és a/D [^cgu]és
SFX P cés ça/D cés
SFX P gés ja/D gés
SFX P és em/C és
SFX P és eu/C és
SFX P és in/C és
SFX P és en/C és

SFX Q Y 42
SFX Q gués c/Z gués
SFX Q qués c/Z qués
SFX Q és í/Z és
SFX Q és eres/Z és
SFX Q és é/Z és
SFX Q és érem/Z és
SFX Q és éreu/Z és
SFX Q és eren/Z és
SFX Q és i/Z és
SFX Q gués ga/Z gués
SFX Q qués ca/Z qués
SFX Q és is/Z és
SFX Q és es/Z és
SFX Q és i/Z és
SFX Q gués ga/Z gués
SFX Q qués ca/Z qués
SFX Q és em/Z és
SFX Q és eu/Z és
SFX Q és in/Z és
SFX Q és en/Z és
SFX Q és és/Z és
SFX Q és era/Z és
SFX Q és essis/Z és
SFX Q és esses/Z és
SFX Q és eres/Z és
SFX Q és és/Z és
SFX Q és era/Z és
SFX Q és éssim/Z és
SFX Q és éssem/Z és
SFX Q és érem/Z és
SFX Q és éssiu/Z és
SFX Q és ésseu/Z és
SFX Q és éreu/Z és
SFX Q és essin/Z és
SFX Q és essen/Z és
SFX Q és eren/Z és
SFX Q és i/D és
SFX Q gués ga/D gués
SFX Q qués ca/D qués
SFX Q és em/C és
SFX Q és in/C és
SFX Q és en/C és

SFX R Y 7
SFX R t t/C t
SFX R ent em/Z ent
SFX R int im/Z int
SFX R ent eu/Z ent
SFX R int iu/Z int
SFX R ent eu/C ent
SFX R int iu/C int

SFX S Y 11
SFX S 0 s/Z [^nçx]
SFX S ç ces/Z ç
SFX S 0 es/Z x
SFX S 0 s/Z [^èé]n
SFX S èn ens/Z èn
SFX S én ens/Z én
SFX S 0 en/Z [^nç]
SFX S ç cen/Z ç
SFX S 0 en/Z [^èé]n
SFX S èn enen/Z èn
SFX S én enen/Z én

SFX T Y 12
SFX T é é/Z é
SFX T é às/Z é
SFX T é à/Z é
SFX T é em/Z é
SFX T é eu/Z é
SFX T é an/Z é
SFX T é ia/Z é
SFX T é ies/Z é
SFX T é ia/Z é
SFX T é íem/Z é
SFX T é íeu/Z é
SFX T é ien/Z é

SFX U Y 25
SFX U 0 o/Z [^gl]
SFX U g g/Z g
SFX U l lo/Z ll
SFX U l l/Z ll
SFX U s s/Z s
SFX U t t/Z t
SFX U y y/Z y
SFX U 0 s/Z [^gsx]
SFX U 0 es/Z [gsx]
SFX U 0 en/Z .
SFX U 0 i/Z .
SFX U 0 a/Z [^g]
SFX U g ja/Z g
SFX U 0 is/Z .
SFX U 0 es/Z .
SFX U 0 i/Z .
SFX U 0 a/Z [^g]
SFX U g ja/Z g
SFX U 0 in/Z .
SFX U 0 en/Z .
SFX U 0 i/D .
SFX U 0 a/D [^g]
SFX U g ja/D g
SFX U 0 in/C .
SFX U 0 en/C .
