ca_ES/ca_ES.dic
acolliré/M
acolloniré/MN
acreixeré/T
admet/SZ
admetent/R
admetés/P
admetia/O
adorm/CU
adscrigués/Q
afegiré/MN
afig/CU
afligiré/MN
aiguabatré/T
ajup/CU
alabat/SZ
alabatent/R
alabatés/P
alabatia/O
al·ludiré/MN
amansiré/MN
apareixeré/T
apercebés/P
aprehenent/R
aprehengués/Q
aprehenia/O
aprèn/SZ
aprendré/T
argüiré/MN
arredoniré/MN
arrup/CU
assumiré/MN
atemoriré/MN
atenent/R
atenia/O
ateny/SZ
atenyeré/T
atenyés/P
atragués/Q
averriré/MN
baliré/MN
barbull/CEU
batent/ER
batia/O
batré/T
bestragués/Q
bestreu/CS
botés/P
brandiré/MN
brum/CEU
brunz/CU
brunziré/MN
bull/CEU
cabent/CR
caberé/T
cabia/O
cartengués/Q
carvèn/CS
carvendré/T
cernent/R
cernés/P
circumscrivia/O
clapiré/MN
clouré/T
cogués/Q
col/CES
colent/R
col·legiré/MN
colltorcia/O
combatés/P
cometré/T
commovent/R
compareix/CS
compareixia/O
complagués/Q
complanyés/P
complauré/T
component/ER
comprèn/CS
comprenia/O
comprimiré/MN
concebés/P
concebré/T
concloent/ER
condiré/MN
condolgués/Q
condolia/O
condorm/CU
coneix/CS
confondré/T
consent/CU
consistiré/MN
constrenyent/R
consum/CEU
contenia/O
contorç/CS
contorcés/P
contrabatré/T
contragués/Q
contraient/R
convencés/P
convencia/O
convertiré/MN
conviu/CS
corfongués/Q
corprenent/R
correspondré/T
corresponia/O
corromp/CS
creixent/ER
creixés/P
cresqués/Q
cruix/CIU
cull/CU
cus/CU
custodiré/MN
debat/CES
debatia/O
decebés/P
decreixent/ER
decreixeré/T
deglutiré/MN
degués/Q
demet/CS
demetés/P
demetia/O
deperiré/MN
deprenent/FR
desacull/CU
desapareixia/O
desaprèn/CS
desaprengués/Q
desavendré/T
desbalairé/MN
descloent/R
descompartiré/MN
descompongués/Q
descomponia/O
descompromet/CS
descreient/ER
descrigués/Q
descriuré/T
descrivia/O
desempedreiré/MN
desencariré/MN
desenfuriré/MN
desengruixiré/MN
desentén/CS
desentortiré/MN
desfavoriré/MN
desment/CU
desmereixent/R
desmereixés/P
desobeiré/MN
despengués/Q
despenia/O
desplau/CS
despoliré/MN
desprenent/R
destorceré/T
destorcia/O
destreny/CS
destrenyés/P
desvergonyiré/MN
desvisqués/Q
detraient/R
devia/O
difluiré/MN
dissol/CS
dissolgués/Q
dissuadiré/MN
distendré/T
distorcia/O
dividiré/MN
dol/CES
embadaliré/MN
embasardiré/MN
embegués/Q
embevent/R
embruniré/MN
emetés/P
emetia/O
emmagriré/MN
emmusteiré/MN
empegueiré/MN
emprèn/SZ
enardiré/MN
encalentiré/MN
encendré/T
encuriosiré/MN
endolentiré/MN
enferotgiré/MN
enfondés/P
enfondiré/MN
enganduliré/MN
englotiré/MN
enguerxiré/MN
engul/CU
enllangoriré/MN
enrariré/MN
enriquiré/MN
ensulsiré/MN
entebeiré/MN
entén/SZ
entengués/Q
entrebatent/R
entrelluiré/MN
entremetés/P
entremetia/O
entresent/CU
entreteixiré/MN
entrevendré/T
envigoriré/MN
enxiquiré/MN
equivalgués/Q
escanyoliré/MN
escarpiré/MN
escometés/P
escriu/SZ
escruix/CU
escull/CU
escup/CU
esllanguiré/MN
espenyent/R
espremeré/T
espremés/P
esqueia/O
estampiré/MN
estengués/Q
estorcés/P
exhibiré/MN
expèn/SZ
exsoldent/R
exsoldés/P
extrauré/T
extreia/O
fengués/Q
fideïcometés/P
fingiré/MN
fotocompon/CS
frig/CU
fument/R
fumés/P
funy/CU
gaudiré/MN
gruny/CEU
incloïa/O
inclouré/T
incumbiré/MN
infongués/Q
introvertiré/MN
ireixés/P
jagués/Q
jauré/T
jeu/CS
juny/CEU
lleient/R
llig/CU
maldorm/CU
malentenia/O
malmetés/P
malpairé/MN
malvengués/Q
mantendré/T
marfon/CS
marfonent/R
marfongués/Q
ment/CEU
menyscreia/O
mereixés/P
mogués/Q
mouré/T
muny/CU
només/P
obvengués/Q
occiré/MN
ofèn/SZ
ofenent/R
olia/O
pareixeré/T
peixés/P
perbulliré/M
percut/CU
perdés/P
permetent/R
permetés/P
pernabat/CS
pernabatia/O
pertanyés/P
pervendré/T
pervengués/Q
pongués/Q
preconcebent/R
preconcebés/P
premia/O
prendré/T
prescindiré/MN
prescriu/CS
pressent/CU
presum/CU
prevalgués/Q
prometés/P
prorrompent/R
proscriuré/T
proscrivia/O
prosseguiré/MN
provengués/Q
puny/CEU
rau/CS
readmetés/P
reaparegués/Q
rebent/R
rebés/P
rebeuré/T
rebevia/O
rebull/CEU
reclou/CS
recogués/Q
reconstruiré/MN
recouré/T
recreixent/R
recreixés/P
recresqués/Q
recull/CEU
recus/CU
redimiré/MN
reescrivia/O
remol/CS
remolgués/Q
remordiré/MN
repercutiré/MN
resoldré/T
resolia/O
responent/R
ressegués/Q
ressent/CU
ressurt/CU
reton/CS
retorcés/P
retrauré/T
retreia/O
retrotraient/R
retruny/CEU
reuniré/MN
reverdiré/MN
reviu/CS
revolgués/Q
riny/CU
riuré/T
rompent/ER
rompés/P
rompia/O
sobrecreix/CIS
sobreescriuré/T
sobresegués/Q
sobreseia/O
sobreseient/R
sobresurt/CU
somou/CS
somriuré/T
sostragués/Q
sotaescrivia/O
sotaescrivint/R
sotbatés/P
subscriu/CS
subscriuré/T
subsistiré/MN
tiny/CU
tolent/R
tolia/O
tongués/Q
torceré/T
torcés/P
transcriu/CS
trasponent/R
treia/O
ullprendré/T
urpiré/MN
ven/CS
vencés/P
viltengués/Q
